Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-110
Board member; salary; expenses.

Each member of the board shall be paid one hundred dollars for each day or portion thereof spent in the discharge of his or her official duties and shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the discharge of his or her official duties as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. Such compensation and expenses shall be paid from the Certified Public Accountants Fund.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 5, p. 57;

Laws 1961, c. 2, § 1, p. 61;

Laws 1981, LB 92, § 3;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 8;

Laws 2009, LB31, § 4;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 1.